Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Public Questions and Constitutional
Matters

120.250.
Contest
or recount of election on public question.

Any elector who was qualified to and did vote on any public question, other than a constitutional amendment or a question of local option under KRS Chapter 242, submitted to the voters of any county, city or district for their approval or rejection may contest the election or demand a recount of the ballots by filing a petition, within thirty (30) days after the election, with the clerk of the Circuit Court of the county in which the election was held, which court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters in such cases. The petition shall be against the county, city or district in which the election was held, and shall set forth the grounds of contest or reason for requesting a recount. The grounds of contest may be the casting of illegal votes, the exclusion of legal votes, the unfair or illegal conduct of the election, tampering with the returns, the alteration of the certificates of the results, bribery, fraud, intimidation or corrupt practices, or any conduct or practice tending to frustrate, obstruct or interfere with the free expression of the will of the voters. A copy of the petition shall be posted at the courthouse door and at one or more public places in the county, city or district in which the election was held. Summons shall be served on the defendant as in equity actions.

Upon the petition being filed, the circuit clerk shall forthwith order the county board of election commissioners and the county clerk of the county involved in the contest to preserve and hold the ballots cast at the election on the question subject to the order of the Circuit Court. The court shall, within five (5) days after the petition is filed, determine whether there are sufficient grounds stated to justify the contest, and shall thereupon require the contestants to give bond for costs, and fix a time for the defendant to answer, not exceeding twenty (20) days.

If the county, city or district affected fails to defend the action, any elector may become a defendant by filing an answer or other proper pleading within thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, and by giving security for the costs in an amount to be fixed by the court. Any elector may join and assist the defendant in resisting the action by filing an application to do so and by giving security for such proportion of the costs as may be adjudged against him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 170; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 139, effective January 2, 1978.

120.260.
Procedure
for recount of election on public question.

If a recount of the ballots
is requested in a proceeding instituted under KRS

120.250

, and the court has
determined that the petition presents sufficient grounds, the court shall
immediately order the ballots of the precincts in which the recount is demanded
sent to the courthouse of the county, in a manner designated in the order,
and shall designate two (2) commissioners to assist in the recount. One (1)
of the commissioners shall represent the contestant and one (1) the contestee.
The attorneys representing the parties may be present at all hearings and
at the recount of the ballots. The court shall pass on all disputes respecting
ballots and shall ascertain the result of the election after counting all
legal ballots.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 171; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 140, effective January 2, 1978.

120.270.
Judgment
in contest or recount of election on public question — Costs —
Appeal.

If it appears in a proceeding instituted under KRS

120.250

that the result as certified is not correct, the correct result shall be ascertained and declared by the court and certified to the county board of election commissioners, and the judgment shall supersede the official returns. If it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the election, or the returns thereof, were materially affected by fraud, duress, bribery, intimidation or corrupt practices, the entire election and the returns thereof shall be declared void and ineffective for any purpose. Costs shall follow the judgment as in equity cases.

An appeal to the Court of Appeals may be prosecuted by the unsuccessful party in the same manner as in other contested election cases. No appeal shall lie from the recount of the ballots, but any questioned ballots may be made a part of the record and the ruling thereon by the Circuit Court may be reviewed, revised or reversed by the Court of Appeals.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 172.

120.280.
Contest
on constitutional convention or amendment, or statewide public question.

Any elector who was qualified to and did vote on any constitutional convention, constitutional amendment, or statewide public question submitted to the voters of the state for their ratification or rejection may contest the election or demand a recount of the ballots by filing a petition, not more than fifteen (15) days after the official canvass and the announcement of the vote for the state by the State Board of Elections, with the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court, which court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear and determine all matters in such cases. The petition shall set forth the grounds of the contest. The contestant may file with the clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court and the Secretary of State a notice of his intention to contest the election before the announcement of the official count by the State Board of Elections and thereupon the Secretary of State shall forthwith notify all the county boards of elections in the counties involved in the contest to hold the ballots cast at the election on the question subject to the order of the Franklin Circuit Court. The notice shall be served by the Secretary of State by mailing a true and certified copy of the notice of contest, and the order to hold the ballots subject to the order of the court, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the sheriffs of the counties in question, and the sheriffs shall forthwith acknowledge receipt thereof.

The court shall, within five (5) days after the filing of the petition of contest, determine whether there are sufficient grounds stated to justify the contest, and shall thereupon require the contestants to give bonds for costs. All of the hearings relating to the contest shall be held in the courthouse of Franklin County.

The clerk of the Franklin Circuit Court shall cause a notice of the contest to be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, setting out the substance or the grounds of contest alleged by the contestants.

Any elector who participated in the election on the convention, amendment, or statewide public question may make himself a party as contestee in the action by filing his petition to be made a party not later than five (5) days after the contest is instituted, and by giving bond of the costs as required of the contestant. If no elector makes himself a party to the contest, the Commonwealth’s attorney for the Franklin Circuit Court shall attend the trial of the cause, and he may file motions and pleadings in the cause on behalf of the Commonwealth to insure a fair and honest determination of the contest.

All laws relating to contested elections for state offices shall apply with equal force to contests of the character contemplated by this section, except as otherwise provided in this section and in KRS

120.290

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 173; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 141, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 1992, ch. 288, § 56, effective July 14, 1992.

120.290.
Procedure
for recount of election on constitutional convention or amendment, or statewide
public question.

If a contest instituted under KRS

120.280

involves the recount of ballots, and the court has determined that the petition of contest presents sufficient grounds, the court shall immediately order the ballots of the counties and precincts in which the recount is demanded sent to the courthouse at Frankfort, in a manner designated in the order. The court may appoint two (2) special commissioners to help make the recount, who shall receive three dollars ($3) per day and their actual traveling expenses, when approved by the Franklin Circuit Court. The attorneys representing the contestant and the Commonwealth’s attorney representing the contestee may be present at all hearings on the recount. The contestant and contestee shall each be entitled to appoint one (1) inspector, who shall be allowed to witness the recount.

The result of the recount of ballots shall be reported to the court within three (3) days after it has been completed, together with all the disputed ballots and any ballots not counted. After inspecting and passing on the disputed and uncounted ballots, the court shall add such of them as are found to be legal to the number of legal ballots determined by the recount. If the court finds that any ballots were procured by fraud, duress, bribery, intimidation, or for valuable consideration, they shall be rejected as illegal and void. If there has been such error, fraud or other irregularity as to make it impossible to ascertain the correct result in any precinct, the ballots from that precinct shall be thrown out and considered void. The vote from a precinct shall not be counted if the contestants prove that there was bribery or intimidation of the electors in that precinct and the court finds that the contestants were in the minority in that precinct and were not in any way implicated in the bribery or fraud complained of.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 174; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 142, effective January 2, 1978.

120.300.
Appeal
from judgment in contest or recount on constitutional convention or amendment,
or statewide public question.

An appeal to the Court of Appeals
may be prosecuted by any party to a contest instituted under KRS

120.280

in
the same manner as in other contested election cases.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 175.